Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-1624
Direct provider; participation requirements; monthly payment.

(1) To qualify for participation in the pilot program, a direct provider shall:

(a) Provide primary care to an enrollee;

(b) Coordinate care across all care settings;

(c) Oversee transitions in care between settings; and

(d) Minimize the risk of gaps in care.

(2) The participating providers shall receive a monthly payment of a per-member, per-month fee for each enrollee for any month or portion of a month in which he or she is enrolled in the pilot program.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 7.
July 19, 2018